Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2706SV (2) 91 ll/jh S.F. 471 Section 1. Section 578A.3, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. An occupant shall not use a leased space for residential 3 purposes. An occupant who uses a leased space for residential 4 purposes is immediately in default and the operator may limit 5 the occupantâs access to the leased space to the hours which 6 the office is open at the self-service storage facility and 7 proceed in accordance with this chapter. 8 Sec. 2. Section 578A.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 578A.6 Right Rental agreement ââ right to deny access due to 11 default. 12 1. A rental agreement may be a written or oral agreement. 13 If a written rental agreement is presented by an operator and 14 if the potential occupant takes possession of the leased space 15 or if an existing occupant retains possession of the leased 16 space, a failure by the occupant to execute and deliver the 17 written rental agreement to the operator within thirty days 18 from the initial or renewed date of occupancy, as appropriate, 19 constitutes acceptance of the terms of the written rental 20 agreement. 21 2. If the occupant is in default or if the operator does 22 not renew the occupantâs rental agreement , the operator shall 23 have deliver to the occupant a written notice or an electronic 24 mail notice, if consented to by the parties in accordance with 25 section 578A.5, subsection 5, to remove personal property from 26 the leased space within fifteen days. During the fifteen-day 27 period, the operator has the right to place reasonable 28 restrictions on the occupantâs use of the leased space, 29 including the right to deny or limit the occupant occupantâs 30 access to the leased space to the hours which the office is 31 open at the self-service storage facility if such right is set 32 forth in the rental agreement. 33 3. Any personal property remaining is subject to lien 34 as provided in section 578A.5 and in accordance with section 35 -1- LSB 2706SV (2) 91 ll/jh 1/ 2 S.F. 471 578A.7. 1